Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 7. Leasing of Mineral Land and Large-Scale Mine Legislative Approval.

Administrative Code. —

For disposition of royalty oil, gas, or gas liquids, see 11 AAC 03.

For oil and gas leasing, see 11 AAC 83.

For other leasable minerals, see 11 AAC 84.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 18, ch. 75, SLA 1987 provides that “[a] minerals management or disposal decision made before June 16, 1987, is valid, whether or not the land was classified if other requirements of law were met.”

Sec. 38.05.135.
Leasing generally; royalty and net profit share payments and interest.

Except as otherwise provided, valuable mineral deposits in land belonging to the state shall be open to exploration, development, and the extraction of minerals. All land, together with tide, submerged, or shoreland, to which the state holds title to or to which the state may become entitled, may be obtained by permit or lease for the purpose of exploration, development, and the extraction of minerals. Except as specifically limited by AS

38.05.131

—

38.05.181

, land may be withheld from lease application on a first-come, first-served basis, and offered only on a competitive bid basis when determined by the commissioner to be in the best interests of the state.

When mineral land is to be leased, in addition to any other notice given, notice must also be given as provided in AS

38.05.945

.

Payment of a royalty or a net profit share payment to the state under a lease issued under AS

38.05.135

—

38.05.181

becomes due on the date and in the manner specified in the lease or in a regulation adopted by the commissioner.

If a royalty or net profit share payment to which the state is entitled under AS

38.05.135

—

38.05.181

is not paid or is underpaid when it becomes due under (c) of this section, the unpaid amount of the royalty or net profit share payment bears interest in a calendar quarter at the rate of five percentage points above the annual rate charged member banks for advances by the 12th Federal Reserve District as of the first day of that calendar quarter, or at the annual rate of 11 percent, whichever is greater, compounded quarterly as of the last day of that quarter.

If a royalty or net profit share payment to which the state is entitled under AS

38.05.135

—

38.05.181

is overpaid, interest at the rate and compounded in the manner provided in (d) of this section shall be allowed and paid on the overpayment. The interest allowance is subject to the following:

if the state grants a credit against future payments for the overpayment, the state shall pay interest on the overpayment

from the date that is the later of the date the overpayment was

due; or

received;

to the date that is the earlier of the date

of notice to the lessee of the credit; or

on which the lessee actually takes the credit;

if the state refunds the overpayment, the state shall pay interest on the overpayment

from the date that is the later of the date the overpayment was

due; or

received;

to the date the state issues the refund.

The issuance by the state and acceptance by a lessee of a credit or refund of an overpayment under (e) of this section does not affect any right of the state or lessee to claim an adjustment and interest on the overpayment.

[Repealed, § 1 ch 37 SLA 2001.]

History.

(§ 1 art VIII ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 1967; am § 2 ch 71 SLA 1971; am § 10 ch 257 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 155 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 35 SLA 1994; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 114 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For payment of oil and gas royalties, rents, and bonuses, see 11 AAC 4.

For availability of land, see 11 AAC 82, art. 1.

For qualifications, see 11 AAC 82, art. 2.

For competitive bidding, see 11 AAC 82, art. 4.

For noncompetitive procedures, see 11 AAC 82, art. 5.

For royalty products, see 11 AAC 82, art. 7.

For Cook Inlet discovery royalty, see 11 AAC 83, art. 10.

Sec. 38.05.137.
Leasing agreements.

The commissioner is authorized to enter into cooperative mineral leasing agreements with the United States regarding land which is the subject of a title dispute between federal and state authorities.
Any such lease need not conform to the provisions of state law applicable to state leases issued under the authority of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 30 SLA 1964)

Collateral references. —

38 Am. Jur. 2d, Gas and Oil, §§ 211-232.

Sec. 38.05.140.
Limitations.

A person may not take or hold coal leases or permits during the life of coal leases on state land exceeding an aggregate of 92,160 acres, except that a person may apply for coal leases or permits for acreage in addition to 92,160 acres, not exceeding a total of 5,120 additional acres of state land. The additional area applied for shall be in multiples of 40 acres, and the application shall contain a statement that the granting of a lease for additional land is necessary for the person to carry on business economically and is in the public interest. On the filing of the application, except as provided by AS

38.05.180

(ff)(3) or

38.05.180

(gg), the coal deposits in the land covered by the application shall be temporarily set aside and withdrawn from all other forms of disposal provided under AS

38.05.135

—

38.05.181

.

The commissioner shall, after posting notice of the pending application in the local land office, conduct public hearings on the application for additional acreage. After public hearings, to the extent the commissioner finds to be in the public interest and necessary for the applicant in order to carry on business economically, the commissioner may, under regulations adopted by the commissioner, permit the person to take or hold coal leases or permits for an additional aggregate acreage of not more than 5,120 acres.

A person may not take or hold at one time phosphate leases on state land exceeding in the aggregate 10,240 acres. A person may not take or hold sodium leases or permits during the life of sodium leases on state land exceeding in the aggregate acreage 5,120 acres, except that the commissioner may, where it is necessary in order to secure the economic mining of sodium compounds, permit a person to take or hold sodium leases or permits for up to 15,360 acres. A person may not take or hold at any one time oil or gas leases exceeding in the aggregate 500,000 acres granted on tide and submerged land, including leases held both as lessee and under option or operating agreement from others. A person may not take or hold at any one time oil or gas leases exceeding in the aggregate 750,000 acres on all land other than tide and submerged land, of which not more than 500,000 acres may be located north of the Umiat baseline, including leases held both as lessee and under option or operating agreement from others. Where more than a single person holds an interest in an oil or gas lease, each person shall be charged only with that percentage of the total acreage that corresponds to its percentage share of the total beneficial interest in the lease.

The commissioner, for the purpose of encouraging the greatest ultimate recovery of coal, oil shale, phosphate, sodium, potassium, sulphur, and geothermal resources and in the interest of conservation of natural resources, after public hearing, or, when the state’s title to land beneath navigable waters has been legally challenged by the United States and litigation initiated, may waive, suspend, refund, or reduce the rental, or minimum royalty, or reduce the royalty on an entire leasehold, or on any tract or portion of a leasehold segregated for royalty purposes, whenever the commissioner determines that it is necessary to do so in order to promote development, or that the lease cannot be successfully operated under its terms. If the commissioner, in the interest of conservation, directs or assents to the suspension of operations and production under a lease granted, the payment of acreage rental or of minimum royalty prescribed by the lease may be suspended during the period of suspension of operations and production. The term of the lease shall be extended by adding the period of suspension to the lease.

The provisions of (d) of this section that apply to waiver, suspension, refund, or reduction of rental or minimum royalty apply to rental or minimum royalty paid before or after June 19, 1970, on any lease covering land beneath navigable waters which, according to the records of the division of lands, is in effect on June 19, 1970.

The submerged and shoreland lying north of 57 degrees, 30 minutes, North latitude and east of 159 degrees, 49 minutes, West longitude within the Bristol Bay drainage are designated as the Bristol Bay Fisheries Reserve. Within the Bristol Bay Fisheries Reserve, a surface entry permit to develop an oil or gas lease or an exploration license under AS

38.05.131

—

38.05.134

may not be issued on state owned or controlled land until the legislature by appropriate resolution specifically finds that the entry will not constitute danger to the fishery.

History.

(§ 2 art VIII ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 68 SLA 1969; am §§ 1, 2 ch 208 SLA 1970; am §§ 3, 4 ch 71 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 1972; am §§ 3, 5 ch 155 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 35 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 140 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 2003; am § 5 ch 92 SLA 2003; am §§ 23, 24 ch 49 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For acreage limitations, see 11 AAC 82, art. 3.

Sec. 38.05.142.
Legislative approval required for certain large-scale mines.

In addition to permits and authorizations otherwise required by law, a final authorization must be obtained from the legislature for a large-scale metallic sulfide mining operation located within the watershed of the Bristol Bay Fisheries Reserve designated in AS

38.05.140(f)

. This authorization shall take the form of a duly enacted law finding that the proposed large-scale metallic sulfide mining operation will not constitute danger to the fishery within the Bristol Bay Fisheries Reserve.

The commissioner may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 to implement this section.

In this section, “large-scale metallic sulfide mining operation” means a specific mining proposal to extract metals, including gold and copper, from sulfide-bearing rock and that would directly disturb 640 or more acres of land.

History.

(§ 1, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 4)

Editor’s notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 4, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 4, provides: “AS

38.05.142

, as enacted by section 1 of this Act, applies only to large-scale metallic sulfide mining operations that have not received all necessary authorizations, licenses, permits, or approved plans of operation before the effective date of this Act. The legislative action required in AS

38.05.142

(a) does not apply to an existing mining operation in the state or a mine that does not affect the watershed described in AS

38.05.142(a)

.”

Section 4, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 4, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[I]t is the intention of the people of Alaska that the provisions of AS

38.05.142

, as enacted, are independent and severable, and if any provisions of AS

38.05.142

shall be held to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of AS 38.05.142 shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 38.05.145.
Leasing procedure.

Deposits of coal, phosphates, oil shale, sodium, potassium, oil, gas, geothermal resources and state land containing these deposits are subject to disposition under regulations, recommended by the director and adopted by the commissioner, and the provisions of AS

38.05.145

—

38.05.181

. In applying the acreage limitations the commissioner may apply the rule of approximation. The uses of the rule of approximation made before March 31, 1960, by the commissioner are ratified.

[Repealed, § 6 ch 155 SLA 1978.]

History.

(§ 3 art VIII ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 16 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 30 SLA 1964; am §§ 5, 6 ch 71 SLA 1971; am § 33 ch 71 SLA 1972; am § 6 ch 155 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For disposition of royalty oil, gas, or gas liquids, see 11 AAC 3.

For availability of land, see 11 AAC 82, art. 1.

For qualifications, see 11 AAC 82, art. 2.

For acreage limitations, see 11 AAC 82, art. 3.

For competitive bidding, see 11 AAC 82, art. 4.

For noncompetitive procedures, see 11 AAC 82, art. 5.

For royalty products, see 11 AAC 82, art. 7.

For records and reports, see 11 AAC 82, art. 8.

For unitization, see 11 AAC 83, art. 3.

For communitization and drilling and development contracts, see 11 AAC 83, art. 4.

For underground storage, see 11 AAC 83, art. 5.

For federal leases and preference rights on Alaska lands, see 11 AAC 83, art. 6.

For exempt lease sales, see 11 AAC 83, art. 9.

For Cook Inlet discovery royalty, see 11 AAC 83, art. 10.

For phosphates, see 11 AAC 84, art. 2.

For oil shale, see 11 AAC 84, art. 3.

For sodium, see 11 AAC 84, art. 4.

For sulphur, see 11 AAC 84, art. 5.

For potassium, see 11 AAC 84, art. 6.

For geothermal leasing, see 11 AAC 84, art. 7.

For geothermal unitization, see 11 AAC 84, art. 8.

For competitive leasing, see 11 AAC 85, art. 1.

For noncompetitive leasing, see 11 AAC 85, art. 2.

For offshore permits and leases, see 11 AAC 86, art. 6.

Sec. 38.05.150.
Coal.

The commissioner may, and upon the petition of a qualified applicant, shall divide coal land or the deposits of coal owned by the state into leasing tracts of 40 acres each, or multiples of 40 acres, and in the form which will permit the economical mining of the coal in the tract.

Thereafter the commissioner may, upon the request of a qualified applicant or otherwise, from time to time, offer the land or deposits of coal for leasing. Each lease shall be awarded to a qualified applicant by competitive bidding or by the method prescribed by regulation.

Where prospecting or exploration work is necessary to determine the existence or workability of coal deposits in an unclaimed and undeveloped area, the commissioner may issue to qualified applicants prospecting permits for a term of three years, covering not more than 5,120 acres with each permit. The commissioner shall grant a two-year extension of the initial three-year term of the permit if the permittee has conducted reasonably diligent prospecting or exploration activities in the area covered by the permit, has not been able to determine the existence and workability of coal deposits in the area, and wishes to continue prospecting or exploring in the area. The commissioner may grant up to three two-year extensions of the initial three-year term of the permit. At any time during the period of the permit, the permittee is entitled to a lease after submitting a mining plan satisfactory to the commissioner for that portion of the land in the permit as is shown to the satisfaction of the commissioner to contain coal in commercial quantities or to be needed for mining, reclamation, or processing the coal.

For the privilege of mining or extracting the coal in the land covered by the lease, the lessee

shall pay to the state the royalties specified in the lease; the royalties shall be fixed before offering the lease, and shall be effective for a period of not more than 20 years; the royalties shall be not less than five cents a ton of 2,000 pounds; the royalty payment is subject to the exploration incentive credit authorized by AS 27.30;

shall also pay an annual rental, payable at the date of the lease and annually thereafter, on the land or coal deposits covered by the lease, at a rate fixed by the commissioner before offering the lease; the annual rental shall be effective for a period of not more than 20 years; the annual rental shall be not less than 25 cents an acre for the first year of the lease, not less than 50 cents an acre for the second year, third year, fourth year and fifth year, and not less than $1 an acre for each year thereafter during the continuance of the lease; the rental for each year shall be credited against the royalties as they accrue for that year; each lease shall provide that the annual rental payment is subject to adjustment at intervals of no more than 20 years and adjustments shall be based on the current rates for properties similarly situated.

Each lease shall be for an indeterminate period upon condition of diligent development and continued operation of the mine, except when operation is interrupted by strikes, the elements, or casualties not attributed to the lessee.

Notwithstanding AS

38.05.132(a)

,

38.05.180

(ff), or

38.05.180

(gg), a lease entered into under this section gives the lessee the right to vent or remove methane and other gas held in association with the coal in the land covered by the lease to ensure safe coal mining operations.

History.

(§ 3(1) art VIII ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 17 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 71 SLA 1966; am §§ 2, 3 ch 68 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 86 SLA 1995; am § 4 ch 140 SLA 1996; am § 25 ch 49 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For competitive leasing, see 11 AAC 85, art. 1.

For noncompetitive leasing, see 11 AAC 85, art. 2.

Sec. 38.05.152.
Sodium.

The commissioner may grant a prospecting permit to a qualified applicant. The permit gives the exclusive right to prospect for chlorides, sulphates, carbonates, borates, silicates, or nitrates of sodium in land belonging to the state for a period of not exceeding two years. The area included in a prospecting permit may not exceed 2,560 acres of land in reasonably compact form. Upon showing to the satisfaction of the commissioner that valuable deposits of sodium minerals have been discovered by the permittee within the area covered by the permit, and that the land is chiefly valuable for these deposits, the permittee is entitled to a lease for all or a part of the land embraced in the prospecting permit at a royalty of not less than two percent of the quantity or gross value of the output of sodium compounds and other related products at the point of shipment to market. The commissioner may lease land known to contain valuable deposits of sodium compounds that is not covered by permits or leases through advertisement, competitive bidding, or other methods prescribed by regulation. The area covered by a lease may not exceed 2,560 acres.

Each lease shall be conditioned upon the same royalty payment specified in (a) of this section and the payment in advance of a rental of 25 cents an acre for the first calendar year or fraction of it, 50 cents an acre for the second calendar year, third calendar year, fourth calendar year, and fifth calendar year, and $1 an acre a year thereafter during the continuance of the lease. The rental for any one year shall be credited against royalties accruing for that year.

A lease shall be for a period of 20 years with preferential right in the lessee to renew for successive periods of 10 years upon terms and conditions prescribed by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 3(4) art VIII ch 169 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.165

.
Renumbered in 2010.

In 2000, in subsection (b), “(a) of this section” was substituted for “paragraph (a)” to correct a manifest error.

Sec. 38.05.154.
Sulphur.

Under regulations adopted by the commissioner, the commissioner shall grant a prospecting permit for sulphur to a qualified applicant. The permit gives the applicant the exclusive right to prospect for sulphur, in land belonging to the state, for a period not exceeding two years. The area included in a permit may not exceed 2,560 acres of land in reasonably compact form. Upon showing to the satisfaction of the commissioner that valuable deposits of sulphur have been discovered by the permittee within the area covered by the permit, and that the land is chiefly valuable for these deposits, the permittee is entitled to a lease for all or a part of the land embraced in the prospecting permit, at a royalty of five percent of the quantity or gross value of the output of sulphur at the point of shipment to market. The commissioner may lease land known to contain valuable deposits of sulphur that is not covered by permits or leases through advertisement, competitive bidding, or other methods prescribed by regulation. The area covered by the lease may not exceed 2,560 acres.

Each lease shall be conditioned upon the payment by the lessee of the royalty fixed in the lease and the payment in advance of a rental of 50 cents an acre a year. The rental for any one year shall be credited against the royalties accruing for that year.

History.

(§ 3(5) art VIII ch 169 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.170

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 38.05.155.
Phosphates.

The commissioner may lease to qualified applicants land belonging to the state which contains deposits of phosphates and associated and related minerals, when it is in the public interest to do so. The commissioner may lease land through advertisement, competitive bidding, or other methods prescribed by regulation. The land shall be leased in units reasonably compact in form and not exceeding 2,560 acres in each unit.

Each lease shall be conditioned upon the payment to the state of the royalties specified in the lease. The commissioner shall fix the royalties in advance of offering the lease. The royalties shall be not less than five percent of the gross value, at the point of shipment to market, of the output of phosphates or phosphate rock, and associated or related minerals. Each lease shall provide for the payment of a rental payable at the date of the lease and annually thereafter. The rental shall be not less than 25 cents an acre for the first year, 50 cents an acre for the second year and third year, and $1 an acre for each year thereafter. The rental paid for any year shall be credited against the royalties for that year. Each lease shall be for a term of 20 years and so long thereafter as the lessee complies with the terms and conditions of the lease.

History.

(§ 3(2) art VIII ch 169 SLA 1959)

Sec. 38.05.157.
Potassium.

Under regulations adopted by the commissioner, the commissioner may grant a prospecting permit to a qualified applicant. The permit gives the applicant the exclusive right to prospect for chlorides, sulphates, carbonates, borates, silicates, or nitrates of potassium, in land belonging to the state, for a period not exceeding two years. The area included in a permit may not exceed 2,560 acres of land in reasonably compact form. Upon showing to the satisfaction of the commissioner that valuable deposits of potassium compounds have been discovered by the permittee within the area covered by the permit, and that the land is chiefly valuable for these deposits, the permittee is entitled to a lease for all or a part of the land embraced in the prospecting permit, at a royalty of not less than two percent of the quantity or gross value of the output of potassium compounds and other related products, except sodium, at the point of shipment to market. The commissioner may lease land known to contain valuable deposits of potassium compounds that is not covered by permits or leases through advertisement, competitive bidding, or other methods prescribed by regulation. The area covered by the lease may not exceed 2,560 acres.

Each lease shall be conditioned upon payment by the lessee of a royalty of not less than two percent of the quantity or gross value of the output of potassium compounds and other related products, except sodium, at the point of shipment to market, and the payment in advance of a rental of 25 cents an acre for the first calendar year or fraction of it, 50 cents an acre for the second calendar year, third calendar year, fourth calendar year, and fifth calendar year, and $1 an acre a year thereafter during the continuance of the lease. The rental for any one year shall be credited against royalties accruing for that year.

Each lease shall be for a term of 20 years and so long thereafter as the lessee complies with the terms and conditions of the lease.

History.

(§ 3(6) art VIII ch 169 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

38.05.175

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 38.05.160.
Oil shale.

The commissioner may lease to a qualified person deposits of oil shale belonging to the state and the surface of as much of the land containing these deposits, or land adjacent to it, as may be required for the extraction and reduction of the lease minerals. The lease may not exceed 5,120 acres of land, and the terms of the lease shall be limited to the extraction of minerals from the oil shale so leased. The lease may be for indeterminate periods upon the conditions imposed by the commissioner.

For the privilege of mining, extracting, and disposing of the oil or other minerals covered by the lease, the lessee shall pay to the state the royalties specified in the lease and an annual rental at the rate of 50 cents an acre for the land included in the lease. The rental paid for any one year shall be credited against the royalties accruing for that year. For the purpose of encouraging the production of petroleum products from shales, the commissioner may waive the payment of royalty and rental during the first five years of the lease.

History.

(§ 3(3) art VIII ch 169 SLA 1959)

Collateral references. —

38 Am. Jur. 2d, Gas and Oil, §§ 275-277.

Secondary recovery of oil and gas. 93 ALR2d 451; 19 ALR4th 1182.

Oil shale: grant, lease, exception, or reservation of oil and/or gas rights as including oil shale. 61 ALR3d 1109.

Sec. 38.05.165.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.152.]

Sec. 38.05.170.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.154.]

Sec. 38.05.175.
[Renumbered as AS 38.05.157.]

Sec. 38.05.177.
Nonconventional gas leases.

The provisions of this section apply to nonconventional gas.

[Repealed, § 58 ch 49 SLA 2004.]

[Repealed, § 58 ch 49 SLA 2004.]

A lease

shall be automatically extended if and for so long thereafter as gas is produced in paying quantities from the lease and the lessee continues to meet all requirements of the lease; a lease issued under this section covering land on which there is a well capable of producing gas in paying quantities does not expire because the lessee fails to produce gas unless the lessee is allowed reasonable time to place the well on a producing status; if drilling has commenced on the expiration date of the primary term of the lease and is continued with reasonable diligence, including such operations as redrilling, sidetracking, or other means necessary to reach the originally proposed bottom hole location, the lease is extended for one year and for so long thereafter as gas is produced in paying quantities; a gas lease issued under this section that is subject to termination by reason of cessation of production does not terminate if, within 90 days after production ceases or a longer period determined at the discretion of the director, reworking or drilling operations are commenced on the land under lease and are thereafter conducted with reasonable diligence during the period of nonproduction; on application by the lessee, the director may extend the lease issued under this section for a period of not more than 10 years if the gas produced from the lease is to be used by the lessee solely for its mining operations;

issued under former (c) of this section before January 1, 2004, may be extended at the discretion of the director; a lease may be extended under this paragraph upon application by the lessee; the director may once extend the lease for a period of not more than three years; in exercising discretion to extend a lease under this paragraph, the director may not extend the lease unless the director considers

the extent of the shallow natural gas exploration activity already conducted on the lease and on adjacent areas;

the probability that further shallow natural gas exploration activity will occur on the lease and will lead to shallow natural gas development and production; and

whether extension of the lease’s primary term will accelerate the eventual production of shallow natural gas from the lease.

[Repealed, § 58 ch 49 SLA 2004.]

[Repealed, § 58 ch 49 SLA 2004.]

[Repealed, § 58 ch 49 SLA 2004.]

[Repealed, § 58 ch 49 SLA 2004.]

[Repealed, § 58 ch 49 SLA 2004.]

[Repealed, § 58 ch 49 SLA 2004.]

[Repealed, § 58 ch 49 SLA 2004.]

A lessee holding a lease modified under AS

38.05.180(n)(2)(A)

may exercise the rights authorized by this section and the lease. The rights granted by the lease must be exercised in a manner that does not unreasonably interfere with eventual development of other mineral deposits on the land leased. However, in a lease entered into under AS

38.05.150

for land that is already subject to a lease covered under this section, coal may not be mined or extracted by the coal lessee from the coal lease without prior agreement with the lessee holding the lease covered under this section.

[Repealed, § 58 ch 49 SLA 2004.]

[Repealed, § 58 ch 49 SLA 2004.]

[Repealed, § 58 ch 49 SLA 2004.]

History.

(§ 5 ch 140 SLA 1996; am §§ 1 — 6, 9 ch 49 SLA 2002; am § 6 ch 45 SLA 2003; am §§ 26 — 28, 58 ch 49 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For noncompetitive procedures, see 11 AAC 82, art. 5.

For noncompetitive leasing, see 11 AAC 85, art. 2.

For practice and procedure, see 11 AAC 88.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Subsection (n) must be construed as applying only to state shallow natural gas leases. May 20, 2003 Op. Att’y Gen.